Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.040

Right of employees to organize and designate representatives without interference.

No public employer, or other person, shall directly or indirectly, interfere with, restrain, coerce, or discriminate against any public employee or group of public employees in the free exercise of their right to organize and designate representatives of their own choosing for the purpose of collective bargaining, or in the free exercise of any other right under this chapter.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 108 s 4.]